Illinois, session 104th, HB5462.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Human Services Professional Loan Repayment 5Program Act is amended by changing Sections 10, 25, and 30 as 6follows: 7    (110 ILCS 997/10)8    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act: 9    "Commission" means the Illinois Student Assistance 10Commission.11    "Human services agency" means a community-based human 12services organization that:13        (1) provides services to varied populations pursuant 14    to its mission;15        (2) provides a range of in-kind benefits, direct cash 16    assistance, or other direct or indirect services in 17    various places and settings as required by individual and 18    community needs; and19        (3) contracts with, receives funding from, or is 20    grant-funded by a State agency for the purposes of 21    providing direct or indirect services that ensure that 22    individuals have the essential elements to build and 23    maintain physical, emotional, and economic well-being at   HB5462- 2 -LRB104 19815 LNS 33265 b1    every phase of life.2    "Professional" means an individual employed by a human 3services agency that contracts with, receives funding from, or 4is grant-funded by a State agency for the purposes of 5providing direct or indirect services that ensure that 6individuals have the essential elements to build and maintain 7physical, emotional, and economic well-being at every phase of 8life.9    "Program" means the Human Services Professional Loan 10Repayment Program. 11    "Qualified program" means a program that offers an 12associate, bachelor's, or master's degree from an accredited 13college or university. 14    "State agency" means the Department of Human Services, the 15Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of 16Juvenile Justice, the Department on Aging, and the Department 17of Public Health. 18(Source: P.A. 102-1089, eff. 1-1-23; 103-31, eff. 7-1-23.) 19    (110 ILCS 997/25)20    Sec. 25. Award; maximum amount. The Commission shall award 21a grant to eligible applicants and may grant preference to 22applicants based on need or income levels or a measure that 23combines need or income levels. The recipient of a grant 24awarded by the Commission under this Act must use the grant 25award for payments toward the recipient's educational loans   HB5462- 3 -LRB104 19815 LNS 33265 b1from a qualified program. The amount of the grant shall not 2exceed: (i) $25,000 per year for a master's degree or higher; 3(ii) $15,000 per year for a bachelor's degree; (iii) $3,000 4per year for a professional with an associate degree; and (iv) 5up to a $5,000 per year add-on if independently licensed as a 6licensed clinical social worker, a licensed clinical 7professional counselor, a licensed practitioner of the healing 8arts, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a 9board-certified behavior analyst, or a registered behavior 10technician. A recipient may receive an award through this 11program for a maximum of 4 years. 12(Source: P.A. 102-1089, eff. 1-1-23; 103-31, eff. 7-1-23.) 13    (110 ILCS 997/30)14    Sec. 30. Eligibility; work requirement. 15    (a) To be eligible to receive a grant under the Human 16Services Professional Loan Repayment Program, the Commission 17must find that the eligible professional satisfies all of the 18following: 19        (1) The applicant is a resident of the State of 20    Illinois. 21        (2) At the time of application, the The applicant has 22    been a full-time employee for at least 24 consecutive 23    months as a human services professional, and the 24    community-based human services agency currently has or did 25    have a contract with, receives funding from, or is   HB5462- 4 -LRB104 19815 LNS 33265 b1    grant-funded by a State agency for the purpose of 2    providing human services during the applicant's 24 3    consecutive month tenure. 4        (3) The applicant is a borrower with an outstanding 5    balance due on an educational loan. 6        (4) The applicant has not defaulted on an educational 7    loan. 8        (5) The applicant must remain a full-time employee as 9    a human services professional in the same community-based 10    human services agency for at least 12 months following the 11    initial application for after receiving this grant. An 12    applicant seeking a renewal award in a subsequent year 13    must be employed by the same community-based human 14    services agency at the time of application and must 15    provide evidence of continuous employment for the 12 16    months that precede the application for renewal. 17    (b) The Commission may grant preference to a previous 18recipient of a grant under the Program, provided that the 19recipient continues to meet the eligibility requirements under 20this Section. 21    (c) The Commission may grant preference to applications 22based on need or income levels or a measure that combines need 23or income levels.24(Source: P.A. 102-1089, eff. 1-1-23; 103-31, eff. 7-1-23.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 262026.